Hawaii statutes.
§516-43 Security for funds deposited.
The Hawaii housing finance and development corporation may, by resolution,
provide that all moneys deposited by it shall be secured: (1) by any
securities by which funds deposited by the state director of finance may be
legally secured as provided in section 38-3, or (2) by an undertaking with such
sureties as are approved by the corporation faithfully to keep and pay over
upon the order of the corporation any such deposits and agreed interest
thereon, and all banks and trust companies may give any such security for such
deposits. [L 1967, c 307, §32; HRS §516-43; am L 1987, c 337, §16; am L 1988, c
104, §2; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16]

Revision Note

Section "38-3" substituted for "38-2".

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next